Louisiana, session 2026, HB101.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 49:170.26 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§170.26. State waterfowl
There shall be an official state waterfowl. The official state waterfowl shall
be the mottled duck (Anas fulvigula maculosa). Its use on the official documents
of the state and with the insignia of the state is hereby authorized.